incubator/apertium-sh-sl.sl.dix
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njiju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njima</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njiju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njiju</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njima</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oni</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njih</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jih</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njim</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jim</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njih</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jih</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njih</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>njimi</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--Pronoun end-->

    <pardef n="ali__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="že__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="v__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oj__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ena__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="koliko__pro">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="baje__part">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="part"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="blizu__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--Paradigmes Jernej -->
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="že"><i>že</i><par n="že__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="v"><i>v</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="v__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ali"><i>ali</i><par n="ali__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="in"><i>in</i><par n="ali__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="oj"><i>oj</i><par n="oj__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ena"><i>ena</i><par n="ena__num"/></e>
    <e lm="koliko"><i>koliko</i><par n="koliko__pro"/></e>
    <e lm="baje"><i>baje</i><par n="baje__part"/></e>
    <e lm="blizu"><i>blizu</i><par n="blizu__adv"/></e>
